Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.420

Undergraduate and graduate educational costs—Reports to regents and trustees.

The education data center must determine and report on amounts constituting undergraduate and graduate educational costs to the several boards of regents and trustees for the state institutions of higher education by November 10th of each even-numbered year.

[ 2012 c 229 s 304.]